Massachusetts, session 194th, H3328.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20 of chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (d).
SECTION 2. Said chapter 30A is hereby further amended by inserting after section 20
the following section:
Section 20A. (1) A statewide public body, hereafter “public body”, whose members are
appointed may allow remote participation by any member for any meeting of the public body.
For the purposes of this section, the term “remote participation” means participation by a
member of a public body during a meeting of that public body where the member is not
physically present at the meeting location.
of 2

(2) Members remotely participating in a meeting may vote and shall be considered
present and in attendance for all purposes, including for purposes of determining a quorum.
(3) All members of the public body participating either remotely or at a meeting location
shall be clearly audible to one another and shall make known the names of members of the
public body and the public present either remotely or at a meeting location.
(4) For any meeting conducted through remote participation, the public body shall make
provisions to ensure public access to the deliberations of the public body for interested members
of the public through adequate, alternative means. Adequate, alternative means of public access
shall mean measures that provide transparency and permit timely and effective public access to
the virtual meeting. Such means may include, without limitation, providing public access
through telephone, internet or satellite enabled audio or video conferencing or any other
technology that enables the public to clearly follow the proceedings of the virtual meeting while
those proceedings are occurring. Documents used for any such meeting should be made available
to the public before or at the time of the meeting of the public body. Where allowance for
active, real-time participation by members of the public is required by law, pursuant to which the
proceeding is conducted, any alternative means of public access shall provide for such
participation. A public body shall offer its selected alternative means of public access to virtual
meetings without subscription, toll or similar charge to the public.
(5) A public body that elects to conduct its proceedings remotely shall ensure that any
party entitled or required to appear before it may do so through remote means, as if the party
were a member of the public body participating remotely.
(6) This section shall not apply to any municipal body.
of 2